Utah statutes.
49-16-402.   Calculation of retirement allowance.
(1)  A retiree under this system shall receive an allowance equal to:
(a)  2.5% of final average monthly salary multiplied by the number of years of
service credit, limited to 20 years; plus
(b)  2% of final average monthly salary, multiplied by the number of years of
service credit in excess of 20 years.
(2)  The minimum allowance payable under this section is $500.
(3) (a)  Except as modified by cost-of-living adjustments and except as
provided under Subsection (3)(b), an allowance under this system may not
exceed 70% of a firefighter service employee's final average monthly salary.
(b)  The allowance limitation under Subsection (3)(a) does not apply to a
member who initially retires on or after July 1, 2010.
